nb: Elektronikk > Spillkonsoller: Håndholdte spillkonsoller; Hjemmespillkonsoller
sv: Elektronik > Spelkonsoler: Bärbara spelkonsoler; Hemspelskonsoler
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Κονσόλες βιντεοπαιχνιδιών: Φορητές κονσόλες παιχνιδιών; Οικιακές κονσόλες παιχνιδιών
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video herné konzoly: Ručné herné konzoly; Domáce herné konzoly
fi: Elektroniikka > Videopelikonsolit: Käsikonsoli; Kotikonsoli
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Consoles de videogame: Consoles de jogos portáteis; Consoles de jogos domésticos
ru: Электроника > Игровые консоли: Портативные игровые консоли; Домашние игровые консоли
hr-HR: Elektronika > Konzole za videoigre: Ručne konzole za igre; Kućne konzole za igre
sl-SI: Elektronika > Igralne konzole: Ročne igralne konzole; Domače igralne konzole
bg-BG: Електроника > Конзоли за видеоигри: Ръчни игрални конзоли; Домашни конзоли за игри
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Consolas de videojogos: Consolas de jogos portáteis; Consolas de jogos domésticas
da: Elektronik > Videospilkonsoller: Håndholdte spilkonsoller; Spilkonsoller
nl: Elektronica > Videogameconsoles: Handheld gameconsoles; Thuis gameconsoles
pl: Elektronika > Konsole do gier wideo: Przenośne konsole do gier; Domowe konsole do gier
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo žaidimų konsolės: Rankinės žaidimų konsolės; Namų žaidimų konsolės
it: Elettronica > Console videogiochi: Console di gioco portatili; Console di gioco domestiche
de: Elektronik > Videospielkonsolen: Tragbare Spielkonsolen; Heimspielkonsolen
ro-RO: Electronice > Console de jocuri video: Console de jocuri portabile; Console de jocuri pentru acasă
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Bảng điều khiển giao tiếp trò chơi điện tử: Máy chơi game cầm tay; Máy chơi game tại nhà
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 게임 콘솔: 휴대용 게임 콘솔; 가정용 게임 콘솔
cs: Elektronika > Herní konzole: Kapesní herní konzole; Domácí herní konzole
ja: 電子機器 > テレビゲーム本体: ポータブルゲーム機; 据置型ゲーム機
es: Electrónica > Videoconsolas: Consolas de videojuegos portátiles; Consolas de videojuegos para el hogar
en: Electronics > Video Game Consoles: Handheld Game Consoles; Home Game Consoles
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子游戏机: 掌上游戏机; 家用游戏机
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > คอนโซลวิดีโอเกม: เครื่องเล่นเกมแบบพกพา; เครื่องเล่นเกมสำหรับบ้าน
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電動遊戲機: 手持遊戲機; 家用遊戲機
hu: Elektronika > Videojáték-konzolok: Kézi játékkonzolok; Otthoni játékkonzolok
tr: Elektronik > Video Oyun Konsolları: Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolları; Ev Oyun Konsolları
fr: Appareil électronique > Consoles de jeu vidéo: Consoles de jeu portables; Consoles de jeu de salon